Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB105.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1638(a) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1638. Advertising.--(a) Whenever any person makes an expenditure for the purpose of financing communications expressly advocating the election or defeat of a candidate, or ballot questions, through any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, outdoor advertising facility, direct mailing, or any other type of general public 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 political advertising, such communication:* * *(3) If not authorized by a candidate, the candidate's authorized political committee or the candidate's agents, shall disclose the largest campaign donors by including a message in the following form:"The top five contributors to the organization for this advertisement are" followed by a list of the five (5) persons making the largest contributions to the organization during the twelve-month period before the date of the communication.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0105PN0058 - 2 - 123456789101112